Utah statutes.
72-9-501.   Construction, operation, and maintenance of ports-of-entry by the department -- Function of ports-of-entry -- Checking and citation powers of port-of-entry agents.

(1) (a)  The department shall construct ports-of-entry for the purpose of checking motor carriers, drivers, vehicles, and vehicle loads for compliance with state and federal laws including laws relating to:

(i)  driver qualifications;

(ii)  Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 4, Uniform Commercial Driver License Act;

(iii)  vehicle registration;

(iv)  fuel tax payment;

(v)  vehicle size, weight, and load;

(vi)  security or insurance;

(vii)  this chapter;

(viii)  hazardous material as defined under 49 U.S.C. 5102;

(ix)  livestock transportation; and

(x)  safety.

(b)  The ports-of-entry shall be located on state highways at sites determined by the department.

(2) (a)  The ports-of-entry shall be operated and maintained by the department.

(b)  A port-of-entry agent or a peace officer may check, inspect, or test drivers, vehicles, and vehicle loads for compliance with state and federal laws specified in Subsection (1).

(3) (a)  A port-of-entry agent or a peace officer, in whose presence an offense described in this section is committed, may:

(i)  issue and deliver a misdemeanor or infraction citation under Section 77-7-18;

(ii)  request and administer chemical tests to determine blood alcohol concentration in compliance with Section 41-6a-515;

(iii)  place a driver out-of-service in accordance with Section 53-3-417; and

(iv)  serve a driver with notice of the Driver License Division of the Department of Public Safety's intention to disqualify the driver's privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in accordance with Section 53-3-418.

(b)  This section does not grant actual arrest powers as defined in Section 77-7-1 to a port-of-entry agent who is not a peace officer or special function officer designated under Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications.

(4) (a)  A port-of-entry agent, a peace officer, or the Division of Wildlife Resources may inspect, detain, or quarantine a conveyance or equipment in accordance with Sections 23-27-301 and 23-27-302.

(b)  The department is not responsible for decontaminating a conveyance or equipment detained or quarantined.

(c)  The Division of Wildlife Resources may decontaminate, as defined in Section 23-27-102, a conveyance or equipment at the port-of-entry if authorized by the department.

